Maryland, session 2026, HB0135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 12–201(e) through (u) of Article – Economic Development of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 12–201(f) through (v), respectively.
– 1 –

Ch. 536 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
12–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(E) “BLIGHTED AREA” MEANS AN AREA IN WHICH A MAJORITY OF
BUILDINGS HAVE DECLINED IN PRODUCTIVITY BY REASON OF OBSOLESCENCE,
DEPRECIATION, OR OTHER CAUSES TO AN EXTENT THAT THEY NO LONGER JUSTIFY
FUNDAMENTAL REPAIRS AND ADEQUATE MAINTENANCE.
(i) (1) “Development district” means a contiguous OR NONCONTIGUOUS area
designated by a resolution.
(2) “Development district” includes an extraordinary development district.
12–202.
(a) (1) This subtitle is self–executing.
(2) A political subdivision need not amend its charter to exercise the
powers granted by this subtitle.
(b) (1) [This] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THIS subtitle does not apply in Baltimore City.
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF § 12–203(A)(1)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE
PERTAINING TO NONCONTIGUOUS BLIGHTED AREAS APPLY IN BALTIMORE CITY.
12–203.
(a) Before issuing bonds, the governing body of the political subdivision shall:
(1) by resolution:
(i) designate a contiguous area within its jurisdiction as a
development district;
(ii) DESIGNATE A NONCONTIGUOUS BLIGHTED AREA WITHIN
ITS JURISDICTION AS A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 536
(III) identify an area that has been designated a sustainable
community; or
[(iii)] (IV) identify an area that has been designated a RISE zone;
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –